Washington statutes.
RCW 24.60.040

Employee death—Benefits.

An employee of a responding member jurisdiction that dies or sustains an injury in the course of his or her employment, while providing assistance under the intrastate building safety mutual aid system, is eligible to receive the benefits that would otherwise be available for injuries sustained or death in the course of employment.

[ 2011 c 215 s 4.]